Utah statutes.
48-1d-304.   Statement of denial.

A person named in a filed statement of authority granting that person authority may deliver to the division for filing a statement of denial that:

(1)  provides the name of the partnership and the caption of the statement of authority to which the statement of denial pertains; and

(2)  denies the grant of authority.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

